Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5671.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-52-4.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-52 entitled "Computer
Crime" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-52-4.2. Cyberstalking and cyberharassment prohibited.
(a) Whoever transmits any communication by computer or other electronic device to any
person or causes any person to be contacted for the sole purpose of harassing that person or his or
her family is guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred
dollars ($500), by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both. For the purpose of this section,
“harassing” means any knowing and willful course of conduct directed at a specific person which
seriously alarms, annoys, or bothers the person, and which serves no legitimate purpose. The course
of conduct must be of a kind that would cause a reasonable person to suffer substantial emotional
distress, or be in fear of bodily injury. “Course of conduct” means a pattern of conduct composed
of a series of acts over a period of time, evidencing a continuity of purpose. Constitutionally
protected activity is not included within the meaning of “course of conduct.”
(b) A second or subsequent conviction under subsection (a) of this section shall be deemed
a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than two (2) years, by a fine of not more than
six thousand dollars ($6,000), or both.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001854
========
LC001854 - Page 2 of 3